District of Columbia statutes.
42-3223

Leases under control of a person with a mental disability — Lease pursuant to provisions of § 42-3222 valid.

All and every such lease or leases so to be made or executed shall be deemed as good and valid, and effectual in the law, to all intents and purposes, as if the person with a mental disability was at the time of making or executing thereof of without a mental disability.

11 Geo. 3, ch. 20, § 2, 1771
Kilty’s Rep. 253
Alex. Br. Stat. 791
Comp. Stat. D.C., 336, § 75
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 64(b), 53 DCR 6198
1981 Ed., § 45-1423.
1973 Ed., § 45-925.
D.C. Law 16-305 rewrote this section, which formerly read:
“§ 42-3223. Leases under control of mentally handicapped—Lease pursuant to provisions of § 42-3222 valid.
“All and every such lease or leases so to be made or executed as aforesaid, shall be and be deemed as good and valid, and effectual in the law, to all intents and purposes, as if such lunatic was at the time of making or executing thereof of sane mind, and had executed the same in his or her own proper person.”